dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.aff
PFX C 0 sazokub/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokub/sY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuba/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokubu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokubw/sY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuk/sY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuku/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokukw/sY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokul/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokul/sY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuli/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokulu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokulw/sY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokum/sY . PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokun/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokung/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokungi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuni/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokus/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokusi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuw/sY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuw/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuw/sY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuwa/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuwu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuy/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuyi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuz/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuzi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokw/sY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG
PFX C 0 sazokw/sY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazol/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazol/sY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazoli/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazolu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazolw/sY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazom/sY . PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazon/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazong/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazongi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazoni/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazos/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazosi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazow/sY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazow/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazow/sY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazowa/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazowu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazoy/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazoyi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazoz/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazozi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazuba/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazubu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazuku/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukub/nY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukub/nY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuba/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukubu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukubw/nY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuk/nY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuku/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukukw/nY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukul/nY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukul/nY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuli/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukulu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukulw/nY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukum/nY . PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukun/nY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukung/nY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukungi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuni/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukus/nY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukusi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuw/nY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuw/nY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuw/nY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuwa/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuwu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuy/nY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuyi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuz/nY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuzi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazuli/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazulu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazum/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazungi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazuni/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazusi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazuwa/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazuwu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazuyi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazuzi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 si/BY [^aeiou] OBJ
PFX C 0 sisek/mX o COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 siseku/mX [^aeiou] COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 sisekw/mX [ae] COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 uk/N o INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 uku/N [^aeiou] INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 ukub/PN [aeiou] INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukub/PN o INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukuba/PN [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukubu/PN [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukubw/PN [ae] INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukuk/PN o INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukuku/PN [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukukw/PN [ae] INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukul/PN [aeiou] INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukul/PN o INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukuli/PN [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukulu/PN [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukulw/PN [ae] INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukum/PN . INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukun/PN [aeiou] INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukung/eNYX [aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG
PFX C 0 ukung/PN [aeiou] INFINITIVE_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukunga/eNYX [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG
PFX C 0 ukungab/eNYX [aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungab/eNYX o INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungaba/eNYX [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungabu/eNYX [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungabw/eNYX [ae] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungak/eYX [aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_EXCL
PFX C 0 ukungak/eNYX o INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungaka/eYX [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_EXCL
PFX C 0 ukungaku/eNYX [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungakw/eNYX [ae] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungal/eNYX [aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungal/eNYX o INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungali/eNYX [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungalu/eNYX [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungalw/eNYX [ae] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungam/eNYX . INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungan/eNYX [aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungang/eNYX [aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungangi/eNYX [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ukungani/eNYX [^aeiou] INFINITIVE_NEG_with_OBJ
