dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.dic
ahlukanisa/BC
aliswa/BC
anda/BC
azana/BC
babuka/BC
bambisa/BC
bazana/BC
beletha/BC
bhadla/BC
bhanqa/BC
bheduka/BC
bhidliza/BC
bhokoda/BC
bhuda/BC
bhuqa/BC
biza/BC
bonela/BC
buka/BC
busa/BC
buzisa/BC
casa/BC
cefezela/BC
chaza/BC
chithisa/BC
ciba/BC
citha/BC
cubungula/BC
cwayiza/BC
damba/BC
dedelana/BC
diliza/BC
dlalwa/BCY
dlinza/BC
dondobala/BC
duka/BC
dunusa/BC
echa/BC
ehlela/BC
ekhama/BC
embuka/BC
enana/BC
eneka/BC
enyisa/BC
epha/BC
esabeka/BC
ethekela/BC
ewuka/BC
fa/BC
faza/BC
fika/BC
fola/BC
fukutha/BC
fumbathisa/BC
futha/BC
gagula/BC
ganiselana/BC
gcama/BC
gcwaneka/BC
genca/BC
gijinywa/BCY
gobhoza/BC
gojela/BC
gqabula/BC
gqiba/BC
gqugquza/BC
gudla/BC
gunyaza/BC
gwala/BC
gwema/BC
gxuma/BC
hambisa/BC
heleza/BC
hlabisa/BC
hlala/BC
hlangabeza/BC
hlanza/BC
hlelemba/BC
hlobisa/BC
hloma/BC
hluka/BC
hlupa/BC
hlwaya/BC
hubhuza/BC
hwalala/BC
jeza/BC
jokola/BC
jwayela/BC
kela/BC
khalakathela/BC
khanda/BC
khaphela/BC
khathula/BC
kheta/BC
khoba/BC
khokhela/BC
khonya/BC
khothuluza/BC
khula/BC
khulunya/BCY
khuna/BC
khuthuza/BC
khweza/BC
klaya/BC
kloloda/BC
kukuza/BC
lalisa/BC
landula/BC
layisha/BC
lethwa/BCY
limela/BC
lisela/BC
lotha/BC
luleka/BC
lungisa/BC
mangala/BC
maya/BC
meka/BC
memeza/BC
misa/BC
mpintsha/BC
mukelisa/BC
na/BC
ncenga/BC
ncipha/BC
ndasa/BC
nenga/BC
neva/BC
ngcwaba/BC
ngenwa/BCY
ngqwamba/BC
nikina/BC
nkinsa/BC
notha/BC
nqanda/BC
nqukuza/BC
ntanta/BC
nuka/BC
nxanela/BC
nyakamba/BC
nyanta/BC
nyelela/BC
nyonyoba/BC
nyunda/BC
oma/BCY
ondla/BC
opha/BC
osulela/BC
paquza/BC
phakamisa/BC
phana/BC
phaphama/BC
phatha/BC
phazima/BC
phelelwa/BC
phenya/BC
pheshwa/BCY
phikisa/BC
phindisela/BC
phiwa/BC
phosela/BC
phucuza/BC
phumelela/BC
phunyula/BC
phuza/BC
poka/BC
qagela/BC
qalisa/BC
qaqa/BC
qeda/BC
qhakaza/BC
qhekeka/BC
qhina/BC
qhubezela/BC
qhumbuka/BC
qhwaka/BC
qinisela/BC
qondwa/BCY
qoshama/BC
quleka/BC
qwaqwada/BC
safuna/BC
sasa/BC
sebenza/BC
setshenziswa/BCY
shabasheka/BC
shanela/BC
shayisa/BC
shelela/BC
sheshwa/BCY
shikisha/BC
shisa/BC
shiya/BC
shosha/BC
shuka/BC
shushisa/BC
shwaphuluza/BC
sika/BC
sina/BC
singatha/BC
siphuzela/BC
siza/BC
sombuluka/BC
songelana/BC
sukwa/BC
swaca/BC
sweswa/BC
tatulula/BC
teta/BC
thambisa/BC
thandana/BC
thatheka/BC
thekela/BC
thelela/BC
thenga/BC
thetha/BC
thinta/BC
thobela/BC
tholisela/BC
thothobala/BC
thuma/BC
thunquza/BC
thwebula/BC
tsheka/BC
valelisa/BC
vimba/BC
vulela/BC
vuthwa/BC
wela/BC
xaba/BC
xhakathisa/BC
xhwala/BC
xoxa/BC
yama/BC
yikazela/BC
yovuka/BC
zanga/BC
zimelela/BC
zongama/BC
PFX B 0 ab [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 abazo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ela [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 en [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 engazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 eningayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 esa [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ey [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ezingazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 obungazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okungazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 olungazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ongayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX N i nge i INSTRUMENTAL/REFERENTIAL_PARTICLE
PFX O i ase . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O i elise . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O a enise . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O u ese . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O u esise . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O i ngase . INSTRUMENTAL/REFERENTIAL_PARTICLE+LOC_pfx
PFX O u obuse . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O i oluse . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX V 0 a . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 enginge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 obunge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 angema . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 esi . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 obungebu . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
